Washington statutes.
RCW 43.119.030

Executive director—Duties.

The [executive] director of the Washington state women's commission shall:

(1) Monitor state legislation and advocate for legislation affecting women;

(2) Work with state agencies to assess programs and policies that affect women;

(3) Coordinate with the minority commissions and human rights commission to address issues of mutual concern; and

(4) Work as a liaison between the public and private sector to eliminate barriers to women's economic equity.

[ 2018 c 98 s 4.]